Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202683-227.01
Beatrice State Developmental Center; patients transferred to temporary surplus space in regional centers at Lincoln and Norfolk; care, custody, and treatment.

The Department of Health and Human Services is authorized to utilize space which is temporarily surplus to the needs of the Lincoln Regional Center and the Norfolk Regional Center facilities under their jurisdiction for patients committed to or lawfully confined in the Beatrice State Developmental Center. Patients so transferred to the Lincoln Regional Center or the Norfolk Regional Center shall be housed in facilities separate and apart from facilities used to house patients committed to such hospital, and after their transfer such patients shall receive the same type of care, custody, and treatment as they would have received had they remained at the Beatrice State Developmental Center, and the charges for their care and maintenance shall be the same as though they were housed at the Beatrice State Developmental Center, and the charges shall be collected in the manner provided in this section and sections 83-227.02, 83-350, and 83-363 to 83-379.

Laws 1961, c. 444, § 1, p. 1365;

Laws 1969, c. 812, § 19, p. 3056;

Laws 1969, c. 818, § 10, p. 3118;

Laws 1996, LB 1155, § 84;

Laws 1997, LB 307, § 221;

Laws 2026, LB1048, § 30.
July 18, 2026